Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-543
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to implement sections 71-539 to 71-544, including procedures
and methods for and limitations
on access to and security and
confidentiality of the immunization information.

Laws 1998, LB 1063, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 399;

Laws 2011, LB591, § 11.